Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-109 Reinsurance. Reinsurance
means an insurance transaction where an insurer, for consideration, transfers
any portion of the risk it has assumed to another insurer. In referring to
reinsurance transactions, this code sometimes refers to the insurer
transferring the risk as the ceding or withdrawing insurer, while the insurer
assuming the risk is sometimes termed the assuming reinsurer or the reinsurer.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Third party liability coverage provided to the State is
insurance, not reinsurance. Att. Gen. Op. 95-2.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next